Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,119
Apprentice salon; owner liability.

The owner of each apprentice salon shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the apprentice salon is operated in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the apprentice salon.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 119;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,158;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 381.